Hawaii statutes.
§287-21 Alternate methods of giving proof.
Proof of financial responsibility when required under this chapter with respect
to a motor vehicle or with respect to a person who is not the owner of a motor
vehicle may be given by filing:

(1) A certificate of insurance as provided in section
287-22 or 287-23; or

(2) A bond as provided in section 287-35; or

(3) A certificate of deposit of money or securities
as provided in section 287-36; or

(4) A certificate of self-insurance, as provided in
section 287-42, supplemented by an agreement by the self-insurer that, with
respect to accidents occurring while the certificate is in force, the
self-insurer will pay the same judgments and in the same amounts that an
insurer would have been obligated to pay under an owner's motor vehicle
liability policy if it had issued such a policy to the self-insurer. [L 1949, c
393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-99; HRS §287-21; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Defendant attempted to show compliance of proof of financial
responsibility by other means. 71 H. 282, 788 P.2d 172.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next